Illinois, session 104th, SB3523.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for grants and 7administrative and operational expenses associated with GRO 8Community. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.